Washington statutes.
RCW 19.48.110

Obtaining hotel, restaurant, lodging house, ski area, etc., accommodations by fraud—Penalty.

(1)(a) Any person who willfully obtains food, money, credit, use of ski area facilities, lodging or accommodation at any hotel, inn, restaurant, commercial ski area, boarding house or lodging house, without paying therefor, with intent to defraud the proprietor, owner, operator or keeper thereof; or who obtains food, money, credit, use of ski area facilities, lodging or accommodation at such hotel, inn, restaurant, commercial ski area, boarding house or lodging house, by the use of any false pretense; or who, after obtaining food, money, credit, use of ski area facilities, lodging, or accommodation at such hotel, inn, restaurant, commercial ski area, boarding house, or lodging house, removes or causes to be removed from such hotel, inn, restaurant, commercial ski area, boarding house or lodging house, his or her baggage, without the permission or consent of the proprietor, manager or authorized employee thereof, before paying for such food, money, credit, use of ski area facilities, lodging or accommodation, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor, except as provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) If the aggregate amount of food, money, use of ski area facilities, lodging or accommodation, or credit so obtained is seventy-five dollars or more such person is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2) Proof that food, money, credit, use of ski area facilities, lodging or accommodation were obtained by false pretense or by false or fictitious show or pretense of any baggage or other property, or that the person refused or neglected to pay for such food, money, credit, use of ski area facilities, lodging or accommodation on demand, or that he or she gave in payment for such food, money, credit, use of ski area facilities, lodging or accommodation, negotiable paper on which payment was refused, or that he or she absconded, or departed from, or left, the premises without paying for such food, money, credit, use of ski area facilities, lodging or accommodation, or that he or she removed, or attempted to remove, or caused to be removed, or caused to be attempted to be removed his or her property or baggage, shall be prima facie evidence of the fraudulent intent hereinbefore mentioned.

[ 2003 c 53 s 146; 1985 c 129 s 2; 1974 ex.s. c 21 s 1; 1929 c 216 s 6; 1915 c 190 s 7; 1890 p 96 s 2; RRS s 6866. Formerly RCW 19.48.110, 19.48.120.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Legislative findings—1985 c 129: "The legislature finds that commercial ski areas, which contribute significantly to the economic well-being of the state, suffer substantial financial losses from the fraudulent use of their facilities by persons who obtain services without paying for them. It is therefore the intent of the legislature that the law that protects hotels, inns, and restaurants from such fraud be extended to also protect commercial ski areas." [ 1985 c 129 s 1.]

Leaving restaurant or hotel or motel without paying: RCW 4.24.230.